DictionaryAnalyser/toy_example/apertium-es-ca/.deps/pgen-ca_valencia.dix
    <pardef n="contrac2_2">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><b/>l'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>l<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/></l>
          <r><b/>l'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>de</l>
          <r>l<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="contrac_2">
      <e>
        <i>ls<b/></i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l<b/></l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="contrac2_2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m<b/></l>
          <r><b/>m'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m<b/></l>
          <r><b/>em<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t<b/></l>
          <r><b/>t'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t<b/></l>
          <r><b/>et<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s<b/></l>
          <r><b/>s'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s<b/></l>
          <r><b/>es<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ll<b/></l>
          <r><b/>ell<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="de2">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>e</l>
          <r>de</r>
        </p>
        <par n="contrac_2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>d'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general_menys_ae"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>a</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="duplica_de"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>de<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="marcats_no_apostrofen"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>de</r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>de<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>d'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="contrac2">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r><b/>l'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>l<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>l</r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r><b/>l'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>l<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant_menys_d"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>de</l>
          <r>l<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="de2"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="contrac">
      <e>
        <i>ls<b/></i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="contrac2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m<b/></l>
          <r><b/>m'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m<b/></l>
          <r><b/>em<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t<b/></l>
          <r><b/>t'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t<b/></l>
          <r><b/>et<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s<b/></l>
          <r><b/>s'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>s<b/></i>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>s</i>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ll<b/></l>
          <r><b/>ell<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="contrac2_per">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>r<b/>l'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>l<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/></l>
          <r>r<b/>l'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/></l>
          <r>l<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="contrac_per">
      <e>
        <i>ls<b/></i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l<b/></l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="contrac2_per"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l/</l>
          <r>r<b/>el/</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m<b/></l>
          <r>r<b/>m'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m<b/></l>
          <r>r<b/>em<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t<b/></l>
          <r>r<b/>t'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t<b/></l>
          <r>r<b/>et<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s<b/></l>
          <r>r<b/>s'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ll<b/></l>
          <r>r<b/>ell<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="a">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>e</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <par n="contrac"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofat_blanc_menys_e"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>a<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="de"> 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>e</l>
          <r>de</r>
        </p>
        <par n="contrac"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>d'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general_menys_ae"/>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>a</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="duplica_de"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>de<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="marcats_no_apostrofen"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>de</r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>de<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>d'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="per">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>e</l>
          <r>pe</r>
        </p>
        <par n="contrac_per"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>per</r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofat_blanc_menys_ae"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>a</l>
          <r>per<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="a"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>per<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>per</r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>a</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="a"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>de</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="de"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>per</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="per"/>
      </e>
